test/resources/upper_expansion.lexc
LEXICON Root
! This is just a comment, not an entry
Boris Male ;
Bo% ris:Bo% ris Male ;
Vladimir:Volodimir Male ;
! 

LEXICON Male
ProperNoun ;
ov Pat ;

LEXICON Pat
ic+Msc:ic ProperNoun ;
na+Fem:na ProperNoun ;

LEXICON ProperNoun
+N+Prop: # ;
Test Male ;  ! Cyclic cc

END
